Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.100

Tampering with fire alarm or firefighting equipment—False alarm—Penalties.

Any person who willfully and without cause tampers with, molests, injures or breaks any public or private fire alarm apparatus, emergency phone, radio, or other wire or signal, or any firefighting equipment, or who willfully and without having reasonable grounds for believing a fire exists, sends, gives, transmits, or sounds any false alarm of fire, by shouting in a public place or by means of any public or private fire alarm system or signal, or by telephone, is guilty of a misdemeanor. This provision shall not prohibit the testing of fire alarm systems by persons authorized to do so, by a fire department or the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection.

[ 2003 c 53 s 23; 1995 c 369 s 3; 1990 c 177 s 1; 1986 c 266 s 80; 1967 c 204 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.